ru: Тип гарнира: Ягоды; Биттер/плавающий гарнир; Конфеты/сладости; Цедра цитрусовых/твист; Кружок/долька цитрусовых; Коктейльная вишня; Коктейльный лук; Кромка для коктейля (смесь приправ); Сушеные цитрусовые; Съедобные цветы; Фрукты (сушеные); Фрукты (свежие); Травы (мята; Оригинальное съедобное украшение (другое); Оливки; Маринованное украшение (другое); Шпажка/пика для украшения; Специи (цельные); Сахарная/соляная кромка; и т. д.); розмарин; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de guarnição: Frutas vermelhas; Amargos/Guarnição flutuante; Guarnição de doces; Casca de frutas cítricas/Twist; Rodela/Fatia de frutas cítricas; Cerejas de coquetel; Cebolas de coquetel; Borda de coquetel (mistura de temperos); Cítricos desidratados; Flores comestíveis; Frutas (desidratadas); Frutas (frescas); Ervas (hortelã; Guarnição comestível especial (outra); Azeitonas; Guarnição em conserva (outra); Espeto/Palito de guarnição; Especiarias (inteiras); Borda de açúcar/Borda de sal; etc.); alecrim; Outro
fi: Koristetyyppi: Marjat; Katkerot/kelluva koriste; Karkit/makeiskoristeet; Sitrushedelmän kuori/kierre; Sitrushedelmäviipale/lohko; Cocktail-kirsikat; Cocktail-sipulit; Cocktail-lasin reunusmauste (mausteseos); Kuivatut sitrushedelmät; Syötävät kukat; Hedelmät (kuivatut); Hedelmät (tuoreet); Yrtit (minttu; Erikoiset syötävät koristeet (muu); Oliivit; Säilötyt koristeet (muu); Varras/cocktail-tikku; Mausteet (kokonaiset); Sokerireunus/suolareunus; jne.); rosemariini; Muu
zh-TW: 裝飾配料類型: 莓果; 苦精/漂浮裝飾; 糖果/甜點裝飾; 柑橘皮/捲; 柑橘輪片/切片; 雞尾酒櫻桃; 雞尾酒洋蔥; 雞尾酒杯口裝飾 (調味混合物); 脫水柑橘; 食用花; 水果 (脫水); 水果 (新鮮); 香草 (薄荷; 新奇可食用裝飾 (其他); 橄欖; 醃製裝飾 (其他); 烤肉串/裝飾籤; 香料 (完整); 糖口/鹽口; 等等); 迷迭香; 其他
ja: 付け合わせの種類: ベリー; ビターズ/フロートガーニッシュ; キャンディ/スイーツガーニッシュ; シトラスピール/ツイスト; シトラスホイール/スライス; カクテルチェリー; カクテルオニオン; カクテルリマー (シーズニングブレンド); ドライシトラス; エディブルフラワー; フルーツ (ドライ); フルーツ (フレッシュ); ハーブ (ミント; ノベルティ食用ガーニッシュ (その他); オリーブ; ピクルスガーニッシュ (その他); 串/ガーニッシュピック; スパイス (ホール); シュガーリム/ソルトリム; など); ローズマリー; その他
sk-SK: Typ ozdoby: Bobuľové ovocie; Horké likéry/vrchná ozdoba (float); Ozdoba z cukríkov/sladkostí; Citrusová kôra/twist; Citrusové koliesko/rez; Kokteilové čerešne; Kokteilové cibuľky; Ozdoba na okraj pohára (korenie); Sušené citrusy; Jedlé kvety; Ovocie (sušené); Ovocie (čerstvé); Bylinky (mäta; Netradičná jedlá ozdoba (iné); Olivy; Nakladaná ozdoba (iné); Špajdľa/napichovátko na ozdoby; Koreniny (celé); Cukrový okraj / soľný okraj; atď.); rozmarín; Iná
da: Type af garniture: Bær; Bitter/float-pynt; Slik-/sødesager som pynt; Citrusskal/citrustwist; Citrusskive/-båd; Cocktailbær; Cocktailløg; Cocktail rimmer (krydderiblanding); Dehydreret citrus; Spiselige blomster; Frugt (dehydreret); Frugt (frisk); Krydderurter (mynte; Spiselig specialpynt (andet); Oliven; Syltet pynt (andet); Spyd/cocktailpind; Krydderier (hele); Sukkerkant/saltkant; osv.); rosmarin; Andet
el: Τύπος γαρνιτούρας: Μούρα; Bitters/Γαρνιτούρα επιφάνειας; Γαρνιτούρα με καραμέλες/γλυκά; Φλούδα/Twist εσπεριδοειδών; Ροδέλα/Φέτα εσπεριδοειδών; Κερασάκια κοκτέιλ; Κρεμμυδάκια κοκτέιλ; Διακόσμηση χείλους (μείγμα μπαχαρικών); Αφυδατωμένα εσπεριδοειδή; Βρώσιμα άνθη; Φρούτα (αφυδατωμένα); Φρούτα (φρέσκα); Βότανα (μέντα; Πρωτότυπη βρώσιμη γαρνιτούρα (άλλο); Ελιές; Γαρνιτούρα τουρσί (άλλο); Καλαμάκι/Οδοντογλυφίδα γαρνιτούρας; Μπαχαρικά (ολόκληρα); Χείλος με ζάχαρη/αλάτι; κ.λπ.); δεντρολίβανο; Άλλο
nb: Garnityrtype: Bær; Bitter/flytende garnityr; Godteri/søtsaker-garnityr; Sitrusskall/twist; Sitrusskive; Cocktailbær; Cocktailløk; Cocktailkant (krydderblanding); Tørket sitrus; Spiselige blomster; Frukt (tørket); Frukt (fersk); Urter (mynte; Spiselig morogarnityr (annet); Oliven; Syltet garnityr (annet); Cocktailpinne/spyd; Krydder (helt); Sukkerkant/saltkant; osv.); rosmarin; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta ukrasa: Bobičasto voće; Gorki likeri / plutajući ukras; Ukras od bombona/slatkiša; Kora / uvojak citrusa; Kolut/kriška citrusa; Koktel trešnje; Koktel lučice; Rub za koktele (mješavina začina); Dehidrirani citrusi; Jestivo cvijeće; Voće (dehidrirano); Voće (svježe); Začinsko bilje (metvica; Neobični jestivi ukras (ostalo); Masline; Ukiseljeni ukras (ostalo); Štapić / čačkalica za ukras; Začini (u zrnu / cijeli); Rub od šećera / rub od soli; itd.); ružmarin; Ostalo
vi: Loại trang trí: Quả mọng; Rượu đắng/Đồ trang trí nổi; Kẹo/Đồ ngọt trang trí; Vỏ cam chanh/Vỏ cam chanh xoắn; Cam chanh cắt khoanh/cắt lát; Anh đào cocktail; Hành tây cocktail; Muối viền ly (hỗn hợp gia vị); Cam chanh sấy khô; Hoa ăn được; Trái cây (sấy khô); Trái cây (tươi); Thảo mộc (bạc hà; Đồ trang trí ăn được độc đáo (khác); Ô liu; Đồ trang trí ngâm (khác); Xiên/tăm trang trí; Gia vị (nguyên hạt); Viền đường/viền muối; v.v.); hương thảo; Khác
de: Art der Garnitur: Beeren; Bitters/Float-Garnitur; Süßigkeiten-Garnitur; Zitrusschale/Zeste; Zitrusrad/Scheibe; Cocktailkirschen; Cocktailzwiebeln; Cocktail-Randgewürz; Dehydrierte Zitrusfrüchte; Essbare Blüten; Obst (dehydriert); Obst (frisch); Kräuter (Minze; Ausgefallene essbare Garnitur (Sonstige); Oliven; Eingelegte Garnitur (Sonstige); Spieß/Garnitur-Pick; Gewürze (ganz); Zuckerrand/Salzrand; usw.); Rosmarin; Sonstige
fr: Type de garniture: Baies; Amer/Garniture flottante; Garniture de bonbons/douceurs; Zeste d’agrume; Rondelle/Tranche d’agrume; Cerises à cocktail; Oignons à cocktail; Givrage à cocktail (mélange d’assaisonnement); Agrume déshydraté; Fleurs comestibles; Fruit (déshydraté); Fruit (frais); Herbes (menthe; Garniture comestible fantaisie (autre); Olives; Garniture marinée (autre); Pique/Cure-dent à garniture; Épices (entières); Givrage au sucre/Givrage au sel; etc.); romarin; Autre
nl: Garneringstype: Bessen; Bitters/drijvende garnering; Snoep-/zoetigheidgarnering; Zeste/schil van citrusvrucht; Schijfje/partje citrusvrucht; Cocktailkersen; Zilveruitjes; Cocktailrandje (kruidenmix); Gedroogde citrusvrucht; Eetbare bloemen; Fruit (gedroogd); Fruit (vers); Kruiden (munt; Speciale eetbare garnering (overig); Olijven; Ingelegde garnering (overig); Spiesje/cocktailprikker; Specerijen (heel); Suikerrand/zoutrand; enz.); rozemarijn; Overig
hu: Díszítés típusa: Bogyós gyümölcsök; Koktélkeserű / lebegő díszítés; Cukorka/édesség díszítés; Citrushéj/spirál; Citruskarika/szelet; Koktélcseresznye; Koktélhagyma; Pohárszél-díszítő (fűszerkeverék); Dehidratált citrusfélék; Ehető virágok; Gyümölcs (dehidratált); Gyümölcs (friss); Zöldfűszerek (menta; Különleges ehető díszítés (egyéb); Olajbogyó; Savanyított díszítés (egyéb); Nyárs/díszítő pálca; Fűszerek (egész); Cukros/sós pohárszél; stb.); rozmaring; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип гарнитура: Горски плодове; Битери/плаваща гарнитура; Бонбони/сладкиши за гарнитура; Цитрусова кора/спирала; Цитрусово кръгче/резен; Коктейлни череши; Коктейлни лукчета; Поръска за чаша (микс от подправки); Дехидратиран цитрус; Ядливи цветя; Плодове (дехидратирани); Плодове (пресни); Билки (мента; Нестандартна ядлива гарнитура (друго); Маслини; Маринована гарнитура (друго); Шишче/клечка за гарнитура; Подправки (цели); Захарен ръб/солен ръб; и др.); розмарин; Друго
es: Tipo de guarnición: Bayas; Amargos/Gota decorativa; Dulces/Golosinas; Piel/Espiral de cítrico; Rodaja de cítrico; Cerezas de cóctel; Cebollas de cóctel; Escarchador de cócteles (mezcla de condimentos); Cítrico deshidratado; Flores comestibles; Fruta (deshidratada); Fruta (fresca); Hierbas (menta; Decoración comestible novedosa (otra); Aceitunas; Decoración encurtida (otra); Brocheta/Palillo para decoración; Especias (enteras); Borde de azúcar/Borde de sal; etc.); romero; Otra
tr: Süsleme türü: Orman meyveleri; Bitter/yüzen garnitür; Şeker/şekerleme garnitürü; Narenciye kabuğu/burgusu; Narenciye halkası/dilimi; Kokteyl kirazı; Kokteyl soğanı; Kokteyl kenar karışımı (baharatlı); Kurutulmuş narenciye; Yenilebilir çiçekler; Meyve (kurutulmuş); Meyve (taze); Otlar (nane; İlginç yenilebilir garnitür (diğer); Zeytin; Turşu garnitür (diğer); Şiş/garnitür kürdanı; Baharat (bütün); Şekerli kenar/tuzlu kenar; vb.); biberiye; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de guarnição: Bagas; Amargos/decoração flutuante; Doces/guloseimas; Casca/espiral de citrinos; Roda/fatia de citrinos; Cerejas de cocktail; Cebolinhas de cocktail; Borda de cocktail (mistura de especiarias); Citrinos desidratados; Flores comestíveis; Fruta (desidratada); Fruta (fresca); Ervas (hortelã; Decoração comestível inovadora (outra); Azeitonas; Decoração em conserva (outra); Espeto/palito de decoração; Especiarias (inteiras); Borda de açúcar/borda de sal; etc.); alecrim; Outra
zh-CN: 装饰类型: 浆果; 苦精/漂浮装饰; 糖果/甜点装饰; 柑橘皮/扭花; 柑橘轮/切片; 鸡尾酒樱桃; 鸡尾酒洋葱; 鸡尾酒挂杯盐（混合调味料）; 脱水柑橘; 食用花卉; 水果（脱水）; 水果（新鲜）; 香草（薄荷; 新奇食用装饰（其他）; 橄榄; 腌制装饰（其他）; 烤签/装饰签; 香料（整颗）; 糖边/盐边; 等）; 迷迭香; 其他
en: Garnish type: Berries; Bitters/float garnish; Candy/sweets garnish; Citrus peel/twist; Citrus wheel/slice; Cocktail cherries; Cocktail onions; Cocktail rimmer (seasoning blend); Dehydrated citrus; Edible flowers; Fruit (dehydrated); Fruit (fresh); Herbs (mint; Novelty edible garnish (other); Olives; Pickled garnish (other); Skewer/garnish pick; Spices (whole); Sugar rim/salt rim; etc.); rosemary; Other
it: tipo di guarnizione: Frutti di bosco; Bitter/guarnizione in superficie; Guarnizione di caramelle/dolci; Scorza/twist di agrumi; Fettina/rotella di agrumi; Ciliegie al maraschino; Cipolline da cocktail; Rimmer per cocktail (miscela di condimenti); Agrumi disidratati; Fiori eduli; Frutta (disidratata); Frutta (fresca); Erbe aromatiche (menta; Guarnizione edibile creativa (altro); Olive; Guarnizione in salamoia/sottaceto (altro); Spiedino/stuzzicadenti da guarnizione; Spezie (intere); Bordo di zucchero/bordo di sale; [ecc.), ecc.)]; rosmarino; Altro
cs: Typ ozdoby: Bobulovité ovoce; Bitters / plovoucí ozdoby; Cukroví / sladké ozdoby; Citrusová kůra / spirála; Citrusové kolečko / plátek; Koktejlové třešně; Koktejlové cibulky; Krusta na okraj sklenice (směs koření); Sušené citrusy; Jedlé květy; Ovoce (sušené); Ovoce (čerstvé); Bylinky (máta; Netradiční jedlé ozdoby (ostatní); Olivy; Nakládané ozdoby (ostatní); Špíz / napichovátko na ozdoby; Koření (celé); Cukrová krusta / solná krusta; atd.); rozmarýn; Ostatní
ro-RO: Tip de garnitură: Fructe de pădure; Bitter/decor de suprafață; Bomboane/dulciuri pentru decor; Coajă/spirale de citrice; Rondele/felii de citrice; Cireșe pentru cocktail; Cepe pentru cocktail; Sare/zahăr pentru marginea paharului (amestec de condimente); Citrice deshidratate; Flori comestibile; Fructe (deshidratate); Fructe (proaspete); Ierburi (mentă; Decor comestibil inedit (altele); Măsline; Decor murat (altele); Țepușă/scobitoare decorativă; Condimente (întregi); Margine cu zahăr/margine cu sare; etc.); rozmarin; Altele
th: ประเภทเครื่องตกแต่ง: เบอร์รี; บิตเทอร์/ท็อปปิ้งลอยหน้า; ท็อปปิ้งลูกอม/ของหวาน; เปลือกซิตรัส/เกลียวเปลือกซิตรัส; ซิตรัสแผ่นกลม/สไลด์; เชอร์รีค็อกเทล; หัวหอมค็อกเทล; เครื่องเทศติดขอบแก้ว (ผงปรุงรส); ซิตรัสแห้ง; ดอกไม้กินได้; ผลไม้ (อบแห้ง); ผลไม้ (สด); สมุนไพร (มินต์; ของประดับกินได้แปลกใหม่ (อื่นๆ); มะกอก; ของดองประดับตกแต่ง (อื่นๆ); ไม้เสียบ/ไม้จิ้มท็อปปิ้ง; เครื่องเทศ (แบบเต็มเมล็ด); น้ำตาล/เกลือติดขอบแก้ว; ฯลฯ); โรสแมรี; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta okraska: Jagodičevje; Grenčice/plavajoči dodatek; Bonboni/sladkorčki; Limonina lupinica/zavitek; Kolobar/rezina citrusa; Koktajl češnje; Koktajl čebulice; Rob na kozarcu za koktajl (mešanica začimb); Dehidrirani citrusi; Užitno cvetje; Sadje (dehidrirano); Sadje (sveže); Zelišča (meta; Nenavadna užitna dekoracija (drugo); Oljke; Vložena dekoracija (drugo); Nabodalo/dekorativna palčka; Začimbe (cele); Sladkorni/slani rob; itd.); rožmarin; Drugo
sv: Garneringstyp: Bär; Bitter/flytande garnityr; Godis-/sötsaksgarnityr; Citrusskal/twist; Citrushjul/skiva; Cocktailkörsbär; Cocktaillök; Cocktailkant (kryddblandning); Torkad citrus; Ätbara blommor; Frukt (torkad); Frukt (färsk); Örter (mynta; Dekorativt ätbart garnityr (övrigt); Oliver; Inlagt garnityr (övrigt); Spett/cocktailpinne; Kryddor (hela); Sockerkant/saltkant; m.m.); rosmarin; Övrigt
pl: Typ dekoracji: Jagody/owoce leśne; Bitters / float (na wierzch); Słodycze; Skórka cytrusowa; Plaster cytrusa; Wisienki koktajlowe; Cebulki koktajlowe; Posypka na brzeg kieliszka; Suszone cytrusy; Jadalne kwiaty; Suszone owoce; Świeże owoce; Zioła (mięta; Inne jadalne ozdoby; Oliwki; Inne ozdoby marynowane; Szpikulec / wykałaczka; Przyprawy (w całości); Cukier / sól na brzeg kieliszka; itp.); rozmaryn; Inne
lt-LT: Garnyro tipas: Uogos; Biteriai / plaukiojantys papuošimai; Saldainių / saldumynų papuošimai; Cirusinių vaisių žievelė / spiralė; Cirusinių vaisių griežinėlis; Kokteilinės vyšnios; Kokteiliniai svogūnėliai; Kokteilio taurės krašto papuošimas (prieskonių mišinys); Džiovinti citrusiniai vaisiai; Valgomos gėlės; Vaisiai (džiovinti); Vaisiai (švieži); Žolelės (mėta; Neįprasti valgomi papuošimai (kita); Alyvuogės; Marinuoti papuošimai (kita); Iešmelis / papuošimų smeigtukas; Prieskoniai (nemalti); Cukraus / druskos kraštelis; ir kt.); rozmarinas; Kita
ko: 가니쉬 유형: 베리류; 비터스/플로트 가니쉬; 사탕/스위츠 가니쉬; 시트러스 필/트위스트; 시트러스 휠/슬라이스; 칵테일 체리; 칵테일 어니언; 칵테일 리머(시즈닝 블렌드); 건조 시트러스; 식용 꽃; 과일(건조); 과일(생과일); 허브(민트; 이색 식용 가니쉬(기타); 올리브; 절임 가니쉬(기타); 꼬치/가니쉬 픽; 향신료(홀); 슈거 림/솔트 림; 등); 로즈마리; 기타